src/fst/morphology/stems/ojibwe_verbs.lexc
LEXICON VAI_Class=VAI_n_Prefix=NONE_Order=Cnj_Endings
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1SgSubj:ziiwaanen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2PlSubj:ziiwegwen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2SgSubj:ziiwanen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlObvSubj:ziinigwen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProxSubj:ziiwaagwen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgObvSubj:ziinigwen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProxSubj:ziigwen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+ExclSubj:ziiwaangen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+InclSubj:ziiwangen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+XSubj:ziiwiingen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+1SgSubj:ziiwaambaanen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+2PlSubj:ziiwegibanen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+2SgSubj:ziiwambanen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3PlObvSubj:ziinigobanen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3PlProxSubj:ziiwaagobanen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3SgObvSubj:ziinigobanen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3SgProxSubj:ziigobanen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+ExclSubj:ziiwaangibanen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+InclSubj:ziiwangibanen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+XSubj:ziiwiingibanen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1SgSubj:ziwaan EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2PlSubj:ziweg EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2SgSubj:ziwan EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlObvSubj:zinid EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlObvSubj:zinig EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProxSubj:zigwaa EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgObvSubj:zinid EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgObvSubj:zinig EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProxSubj:zig EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+ExclSubj:ziwaang EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+InclSubj:ziwang EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+XSubj:zing EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1SgSubj:ziwaambaan EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2PlSubj:ziwegiban EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2SgSubj:ziwamban EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlObvSubj:zinigoban EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProxSubj:zigwaaban EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgObvSubj:zinigoban EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProxSubj:zigoban EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+ExclSubj:ziwaangiban EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+InclSubj:ziwangiban EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+XSubj:zingiban EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1SgSubj:owaanen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2PlSubj:owegwen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2SgSubj:owanen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlObvSubj:inigwen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProxSubj:owaagwen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgObvSubj:inigwen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProxSubj:ogwen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+ExclSubj:owaangen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+InclSubj:owangen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+XSubj:owiingen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+1SgSubj:owaambaanen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+2PlSubj:owegibanen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+2SgSubj:owambanen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3PlObvSubj:inigobanen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3PlProxSubj:owaagobanen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3SgObvSubj:inigobanen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3SgProxSubj:ogobanen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+ExclSubj:owaangibanen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+InclSubj:owangibanen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+XSubj:owiingibanen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1SgSubj:aan EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2PlSubj:eg EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2SgSubj:an EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlObvSubj:inid EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProxSubj:owaad EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgObvSubj:inid EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProxSubj:g EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+ExclSubj:aang EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+InclSubj:ang EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+XSubj:ing EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1SgSubj:aambaan EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2PlSubj:egiban EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2PlSubj:egoban EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2SgSubj:amban EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlObvSubj:inipan EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProxSubj:owaapan EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgObvSubj:inipan EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProxSubj:giban EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+ExclSubj:aangiban EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+InclSubj:angiban EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+InclSubj:angoban EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+XSubj:ingiban EncliticRoot ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VAI, Class: VAI_V                                          !
!         Morpheme boundary between stem and suffix                            !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary
+VAI+Der/magad:0%>%>V1magad VII_Class=VII_d_Boundary ;
0:%>%> VAI_Class=VAI_V_Flags ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VAI, Class: VAI_V                                          !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending                                                    !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VAI_Class=VAI_V_Flags
@R.Prefix.%<CHCNJ%>@ VAI_Class=VAI_V_Flags_Prefix=%<CHCNJ%> ;
@R.Prefix.GAA-@ VAI_Class=VAI_V_Flags_Prefix=GAA- ;
@R.Prefix.GI@ VAI_Class=VAI_V_Flags_Prefix=GI ;
@R.Prefix.NI@ VAI_Class=VAI_V_Flags_Prefix=NI ;
@R.Prefix.NONE@ VAI_Class=VAI_V_Flags_Prefix=NONE ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VAI, Class: VAI_V                                          !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending_Prefix=NONE                                        !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VAI_Class=VAI_V_Flags_Prefix=NONE
@U.Order.Cnj@ VAI_Class=VAI_V_Prefix=NONE_Order=Cnj_Endings ;
@U.Order.Ind@ VAI_Class=VAI_V_Prefix=NONE_Order=Ind_Endings ;
@U.Order.Other@ VAI_Class=VAI_V_Prefix=NONE_Order=Other_Endings ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VAI, Class: VAI_V, Prefix: NONE, Order: Cnj                !
!         Endings                                                              !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VAI_Stems
aabitawizi VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
aagwiingwe'o VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
aanamoozo VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
aanji-bimaadizi VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
aapidwewemo VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
aawajigaazo VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
aayezhisagizi VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
aazhidegwaaso VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
abinoojiinyikaazo VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
agaasadegizi VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
agaji VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
agoozo VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
agwaawiganezo VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
ajijibizo VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
akwabi VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
andawendaagozi:nandawendaagozi VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
anibezi VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
animikogaabawi VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
anishinaabensiwi VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
apagamo VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
apiitaakozi VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
apishimo VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
ashawezi VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
ashkibagizi VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
ayekobagizo VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
baabii'o VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
baapiingweni VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
baazhijigwaaso VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
babigwegizi VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
bagamaanimizi VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
bagwaneyaabikizi VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
bakobiiyaashi VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
bapawaangeni VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
bengogizi VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
bibagikozo VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
biidaashi VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
biijigwaashkwani VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
biindazisonebi VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
biisaagonagizi VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
bimaajimo VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
bimidewi VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
binaaboozo VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
biska'oozo VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
bookwaakizo VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
daadozo VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
dadenimo VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
dakwaagiiyawezi VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
datakobizo VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
debwewesagizhaazo VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
dipizi VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
gaandanaamo VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
gaazhagensiwi VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
gagwaanisagimaaso VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
gashkendamokaazo VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
gibaabogo VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
gibwaakwaji VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
gidoone'amaazo VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
giimoojigidaazo VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
giiwashkwenanoozo VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
giizhoo'o VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
ginagamanji'o VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
gipagijiishkiwagizi VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
gizhiibijiidi VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
gonabibizo VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
gwaashkoni VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
gwiikwiingo'o VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
inaadagaakobizo VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
ingodwaaso-giiziswagizi VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
inwewegamijiizo VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
ishwaaso-giiziswagizi VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
izhizigozi VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
jiichiibizidebani'o VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
maadaaso VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
maamawitaagozi VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
maazhomo VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
makadewaaso VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
mamaanjibani'o VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
mamiskojaabi VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
mashkawaashi VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
mayaawibani'o VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
michiigizi VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
mikwamiiwi VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
minwaabi VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
miskwaakoshkigaazo VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
miziwezigozi VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
na'iiwinikeshkoozo VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
naaniibawi VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
nabweginigaazo VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
naniizaaninaagozi VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
ngodwaasogonagizi VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
niibawi VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
niishtana-shi-naanwaginzo VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
niizhooninjiishkoozo VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
ningwaa'ago VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
nisidotaagozi VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
noomaabkinigaazo VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
obiiwaabikomi VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
odewe'igani VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
ogozisi VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
okwegani VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
omishoomenyi VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
ondaashi VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
onjigwaashkwani VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
osaye'i VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
owiiyawen'enyi VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
ozhaawashkwadiso VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
waabanoo-nagamo VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
waanina'o VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
waijiishigi VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
wapaataagozi VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
wawizhimo VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
wiidigekaazo VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
wiisaandaso VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
zaagagwamo VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
zaagininjiini VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
zagozi VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
zhaaboshkoozo VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
zhaazhiibigaadeni VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
zhiibaagaabawi VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
zhiiwitaaganizi VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
ziigaajiwanzo VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
zoongamanji'o VAI_Class=VAI_V_Boundary ;
